Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.220

Milk dealer license—Application for—Contents.

Application for a license to act as a milk dealer shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall contain, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) The nature of the business to be conducted;

(2) The full name and address of the person applying for the license if an individual; and if a partnership, the full name and address of each member thereof; and if a corporation, the full name and address of each officer and director;

(3) The complete address at which the business is to be conducted;

(4) Facts showing that the applicant has adequate personnel and facilities to properly conduct the business of a milk dealer;

(5) Facts showing that the applicant has complied with all the rules prescribed by the director under the provisions of this chapter;

(6) Any other reasonable information the director may require.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 22.]